Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.170

Employees—Benefits.

The public facilities district shall have authority to create and fill positions, fix wages, salaries, and bonds therefor, pay costs involved in securing or arranging to secure employees, and establish benefits for employees, including holiday pay, vacations or vacation pay, retirement benefits, medical, life, accident, or health disability insurance, as approved by the board. Public facilities district board members, at their own expense, shall be entitled to medical, life, accident, or health disability insurance. Insurance for employees and board members shall not be considered compensation. District coverage for the board is not to exceed that provided public facilities district employees.

[ 1995 c 396 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 c 396: See note following RCW 36.100.010.